Vermont, session 2025-2026, H317.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 4A is added to read:
Subchapter 4A. Credit Card Fees on Taxes and Gratuities
§ 2480s. PROHIBITION ON FEES
(a) As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #379549 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.317
2025 Page 2 of 6
(1) “Acquirer bank” means a member of a payment card network that
contracts with a merchant either directly or indirectly through a processor for
the settlement of electronic payment transactions.
(2) “Electronic payment transaction” or “transaction” means a
transaction in which a person uses a debit card, credit card, or other payment
code or device issued or approved through a payment card network to debit a
deposit account or use a line of credit, whether authorization is based on a
signature, a personal identification number, or other means.
(3) “Gratuity” means:
(A) voluntary monetary contribution received by a merchant from a
guest, patron, or customer for services rendered; and
(B) an automatic service fee received by a merchant from a guest,
patron, or customer for services rendered that is intended to replace the need
for a voluntary monetary contribution pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (3).
(4) “Interchange fee” means a fee established, charged, or received by a
payment card network for the purpose of compensating the issuer for its
involvement in an electronic payment transaction.
(5) “Issuer” means a person who issues a debit card or a credit card.
(6) “Merchant” means a person that collects and remits a tax.
VT LEG #379549 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.317
2025 Page 3 of 6
(7) “Payment card network” means an entity that directly or through
licensed members, processors, or agents provides the proprietary services,
infrastructure, and software that route information and data to facilitate
transaction authorization, clearance, and settlement, and that merchants are
required to access in order to accept a specific brand of general-purpose credit
cards, charge cards, debit cards, or stored-value cards as payment for goods
and services.
(8) “Processor” means an entity that facilitates, services, processes, or
manages a debit card or credit card authorization, billing, transfer, payment
procedures, or settlement with respect to an electronic payment transaction.
(b) Requirements.
(1) With respect to transactions involving a merchant and subject to the
restrictions set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection, no issuer, payment
card network, acquirer bank, or processor shall charge or collect from a
merchant an interchange fee on the amount of the transaction that is a:
(A) tax; or
(B) gratuity.
(2)(A) A merchant shall transmit the amount of a transaction that is tax
and gratuity to the acquirer bank, payment card network, issuer, or any
designee of the foregoing as part of the transaction’s authorization or
settlement process.
VT LEG #379549 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.317
2025 Page 4 of 6
(B) An acquirer bank, payment card network, issuer, or any designee
of the foregoing that does not receive from a merchant the amount of a
transaction that is tax and gratuity as part of the transaction’s authorization or
settlement process pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) may
charge the merchant an interchange fee on the entire transaction.
(C) A merchant that does not transmit the amount of a transaction
that is tax and gratuity to the acquirer bank, payment card network, issuer, or
any designee of the foregoing as part of the transaction’s authorization or
settlement process pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) may
submit tax documentation showing the tax and gratuity amount of the
transaction to the acquirer bank or its designee not later than 180 days after the
transaction.
(D) An acquirer bank, payment card network, issuer, or any designee
of the foregoing that receives tax documentation from a merchant pursuant to
subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2) shall, not later than 30 days after
receiving the tax documentation, credit the merchant for the amount in
interchange fees that were collected on the tax and gratuity amount of the
transaction.
(3) A merchant that submits an amount of tax or gratuity of a transaction
that is inaccurate shall provide the acquirer bank, payment card network,
issuer, or any designee of the foregoing with the corrected amount not later
VT LEG #379549 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.317
2025 Page 5 of 6
than 30 days after the merchant receives notice that the amount was inaccurate.
If the corrected amount of a transaction that is tax and gratuity:
(A) is greater than what was reported by the merchant, the acquirer
bank, payment card network, issuer, or any designee of the foregoing shall
credit the merchant the difference in interchange fees between then amount
originally reported by the merchant and the corrected amount subsequently
reported by the merchant; or
(B) is less than what was reported by the merchant, the merchant
shall credit the acquirer bank, payment card network, issuer, or any designee of
the foregoing the difference in interchange fees between the amount originally
reported by the merchant and the corrected amount subsequently reported by
the merchant.
(4) It shall be unlawful for an issuer, payment card network, acquirer
bank, or processor to alter or manipulate an interchange fee of a transaction in
an effort to circumvent the effects of this section.
(c) Penalties. The following penalties shall apply to violations of this
subchapter:
(1) Any issuer, payment card network, acquirer bank, or processor found
to have violated this section shall be liable for a civil penalty of $1,000.00 per
transaction.
VT LEG #379549 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.317
2025 Page 6 of 6
(2) Any merchant whose rights under this subchapter have been violated
may maintain a civil action for damages or equitable relief as provided for in
this section, including attorney’s fees, if any.
(3) A violation of this section shall be deemed a violation of section
2453 of this title. The Attorney General has the same authority to conduct civil
investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions
as provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.
(d) Severability. If any provision of this subchapter or its application to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of this subchapter that can be given effect without
the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this
subchapter are severable.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379549 v.1